Wyoming, session 2025, HB0004.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-410 is created to read:
31-2-410. Antique snowmobiles.
(a) Antique snowmobiles may be registered pursuant to
this section.
(b) The owner of an antique snowmobile may register
the snowmobile by submitting an application to the
department indicating that the snowmobile is operated for
the purposes of organized antique snowmobile activities,
parades, exhibitions, tours and other related activities
and may be used for general snowmobile uses.
(c) Upon receipt of the registration fee pursuant to
W.S. 31-2-404(a)(iii), the selling agent shall issue to the
owner for each antique snowmobile a certificate of
registration, setting forth the facts in the application,
together with a numbered decal which shall bear a
distinctive number assigned to the snowmobile, which decal
shall at all times be prominently displayed on the
snowmobile. The registration expires upon transfer of
ownership of the antique snowmobile.
Section 2. W.S. 31-2-401(a)(ii), 31-2-402(b),
31-2-404(a), 31-2-405(a), 31-2-409(a)(intro), (ii) and by
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
creating a new paragraph (iii), 36-4-123(a)(intro) and
39-17-111(c)(ii) are amended to read:
31-2-401. Definitions.
(a) For purposes of this act:
(ii) "Snowmobile" means any mechanically driven
vehicle of a type which utilizes sled type runners, or
skis, or any endless belt tread or combination of these,
designed primarily for operation over snow.; The term
includes the following vehicle as hereafter defined:
(A) "Antique" means any snowmobile that is
at least twenty (20) years old and is operated for the
purposes stated in W.S. 31-2-410(b).
31-2-402. Registration selling agents; application
for registration.
(b) The department of state parks and cultural
resources through the division of state parks and historic
sites shall in accordance with W.S. 36-4-123, appoint
selling agents to sell snowmobile registrations and user
fees. Each selling agent shall retain one dollar ($1.00)
for each nonresident user fee sold under W.S.
31-2-409(a)(ii) or (iii) and for each resident snowmobile
registration sold under W.S. 31-2-404(a)(i) or (iii).
Designated department employees may sell snowmobile
registrations and user fees, but no employee shall receive
any commission on registrations or user fees collected.
31-2-404. Amount of fee; ad valorem tax exemption;
disposition of fees; duties of department of state parks
and cultural resources.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) Except as provided in W.S. 31-2-408, the annual
registration fee for a resident snowmobile is:
(i) For a snowmobile intended for private use
$35.00 $50.00 annually;
(ii) For a commercial snowmobile $105.00 $150.00
annually;
(iii) For an antique snowmobile $25.00 paid at
the time of registration.
31-2-405. Payment of fees; issuance of certificate
and decal.
(a) Except as provided in W.S. 31-2-410, resident
snowmobile registration fees shall be paid before the
expiration of thirty (30) days after acquiring ownership of
a snowmobile which will be operated within the state of
Wyoming. Upon receipt of the registration fee the selling
agent shall issue to the owner for each snowmobile a
certificate of registration, setting forth the facts in the
application, together with a numbered decal which shall
bear a distinctive number assigned to the snowmobile and
the date of expiration, which decal shall at all times be
prominently displayed on the snowmobile.
31-2-409. Snowmobile user fee; amount of fee;
disposition of fees; account created; duties of department
of state parks and cultural resources; duration of decal;
exemptions.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) There shall be collected by selling agents an
annual a nonresident snowmobile user fee for nonresident
snowmobiles operated in Wyoming as follows:
(ii) For any nonresident snowmobile not exempt
under subsection (f) of this section $35.00 $75.00
annually;
(iii) For an antique snowmobile $25.00 paid at
the time of registration.
36-4-123. Selling agents for registrations, licenses
and permits.
(a) The department of state parks and cultural
resources through the division of parks and historic sites
shall appoint selling agents to sell snowmobile
registrations pursuant to W.S. 31-2-402 and 31-2-410,
permits under W.S. 36-4-121 and other licenses,
registrations and permits for which the department may by
law be required to issue and collect fees. Selling agents
appointed under this section shall be bonded by the
department, subject to the following:
39-17-111. Distribution.
(c) The department shall credit to appropriate
accounts based upon deductions from the taxes collected
under this article in the following order:
(ii) Deduct an amount collected on fuel used in
snowmobiles, computed by multiplying the number of
snowmobiles for which registration and user fees have been
paid during the current fiscal year under W.S.
31-2-404(a)(i) and (iii) and 31-2-409(a)(ii) and (iii)
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
times twenty-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($28.75)
plus the number of gallons of gasoline used by snowmobiles
for which registration fees have been paid during the
current fiscal year under W.S. 31-2-404(a)(ii) times the
current gasoline tax rate as defined by W.S.
39-17-104(a)(i). The number of gallons used by commercial
snowmobiles shall be reported to the department by all
businesses offering commercial snowmobile recreational
leasing. The amounts computed shall be credited to a
separate account to be expended by the department of state
parks and cultural resources to improve snowmobile trails
in Wyoming;
Section 3. The department of state parks and cultural
resources shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this act not later than July 1, 2025.
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
6